Hawaii statutes.
§302D-5 Authorizer powers, duties, and
liabilities. (a) Authorizers are responsible for executing the following
essential powers and duties:

(1) Soliciting and evaluating charter applications;

(2) Approving quality charter applications that meet
identified educational needs and promote a diversity of educational choices;

(3) Declining to approve weak or inadequate charter
applications;

(4) Negotiating and executing sound charter contracts
with each approved charter applicant and with existing public charter schools;

(5) Monitoring, in accordance with charter contract
terms, the performance and legal compliance of public charter schools; and

(6) Determining whether each charter contract merits
renewal, nonrenewal, or revocation.

(b) An authorizer shall:

(1) Act as a point of contact between the department
and a public charter school it authorizes;

(2) Be responsible for and ensure the compliance of a
public charter school it authorizes with all applicable state and federal laws,
including reporting requirements;

(3) Be responsible for the receipt of applicable
federal funds from the department and the distribution of funds to the public
charter school it authorizes; and

(4) Be responsible for the receipt of per-pupil
funding from the department of budget and finance and distribution of the
funding to the public charter school it authorizes.

(c) An authorizer shall have the power to make
and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the
exercise of its duties and functions under this chapter.

(d) An authorizer may delegate its duties to
officers, employees, and contractors.

(e) Regulation by authorizers shall be limited
to the powers and duties set forth in this section, and shall be consistent
with the spirit and intent of this chapter.

(f) An authorizer, members of the board of an
authorizer acting in their official capacity, and employees or agents of an
authorizer are immune from civil and criminal liability with respect to all
activities related to a public charter school authorized by that authorizer,
except for any acts or omissions constituting wilful misconduct. Members of
the commission shall be afforded the same protection afforded the members of
the board pursuant to section 26-35.5.

(g) An authorizer shall not provide technical
support to a prospective charter school applicant, an applicant governing
board, or a charter school it authorizes in cases in which the technical
support will directly and substantially impact any authorizer decision related
to the approval or denial of the charter application or the renewal,
revocation, or nonrenewal of the charter contract. This subsection shall not
apply to technical support that an authorizer is required to provide to a
charter school pursuant to federal law. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c
159, §5; am L 2014, c 99, §5; am L 2015, c 114, §3; am L 2016, c 113, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next